Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1457.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1330(b) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1330. Alternative ratemaking for utilities.* * *(b) Alternative rate mechanisms.--* * *(4) An alternative rate mechanism may not be based on expected temperatures, including weather normalization adjustments. Any alternative rate mechanism that is based on expected temperatures and approved by the commission shall be unenforceable and the utility shall apply the base rate to any customer that was previously charged an alternative rate mechanism based on expected temperatures.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1457PN1710 - 2 - 12